Utah, session 2026, HB358.
Section 1. Section 53F-2-102 is amended to read:53F-2-102. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Attendance-validated program" means an educational program where:(a)student participation is measured by physical or virtual attendance at scheduled instructional periods; and(b)a student receives direct teacher interaction and instruction for the course or program the student is enrolled in.(1)(2)"Basic state-supported school program," "basic program," or "basic school program" means public education programs for kindergarten, elementary, and secondary school students that are operated and maintained for the amount derived by multiplying the number of weighted pupil units for each school district or charter school by the value established each year in the enacted public education budget, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.(2)(3)"LEA governing board" means a local school board or charter school governing board.(3)(4)"Pupil in average daily membership" or "ADM" means a full-day equivalent pupil.(4)(5)(a)"Minimum School Program" means the state-supported public school programs for kindergarten, elementary, and secondary schools as described in this Subsection (4)(5).(b)The Minimum School Program established in school districts and charter schools shall include the equivalent of a school term of nine months as determined by the state board.(c)(i)The state board shall establish :(A)except as provided in Subsection (5)(c)(i)(B), the number of days or equivalent instructional hours that school is held for an academic school year., allowing flexibility for elementary, middle, and junior high schools to adapt schedules to align with high schools described in Subsection (5)(c)(i)(B); and(B)for grades 9 through 12 that use an attendance-validated program, the number of credits required to graduate high school based on one credit representing at least 83 class hours, in lieu of a requirement of days or instructional hours.(ii)Education, enhanced by utilization of technologically enriched delivery systems, when approved by an LEA governing board, shall receive full support by the state board as it pertains to fulfilling the attendance requirements, excluding time spent viewing commercial advertising.(d)(i)An LEA governing board may reallocate up to 32 instructional hours or four school days established under Subsection (4)(c)(5)(c) for teacher preparation time or teacher professional development.(ii)A reallocation of instructional hours or school days under Subsection (4)(d)(i)(5)(d)(i) is subject to the approval of two-thirds of the members of an LEA governing board voting in a regularly scheduled meeting:(A)at which a quorum of the LEA governing board is present; and(B)held in compliance with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.(iii)If an LEA governing board reallocates instructional hours or school days as provided by this Subsection (4)(d)(5)(d), the school district or charter school shall notify students' parents of the school calendar at least:(A)90 days before the beginning of the school year; or(B)for the 2021-2022 and 2022-2023 school years, due to circumstances within the LEA or a given school due to the COVID-19 pandemic, at least 14 calendar days before the reallocated instructional hours or school days.(iv)Instructional hours or school days reallocated for teacher preparation time or teacher professional development pursuant toin accordance with this Subsection (4)(d)(5)(d) is considered part of a school term referred to in Subsection (4)(b)(5)(b).(e)The Minimum School Program includes a program or allocation funded by a line item appropriation or other appropriation designated as follows:(i)Basic School Program;(ii)Related to Basic Programs;(iii)Voted and Board Levy Programs; or(iv)Minimum School Program.(5)(6)"Weighted pupil unit or units" or "WPU or WPUs" means the unit of measure of factors that is computed in accordance with this chapter for the purpose of determining the costs of a program on a uniform basis for each school district or charter school.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53G-6-705 is amended to read:53G-6-705. Online students' participation in extracurricular activities.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Association" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-7-1101.(b)"Extracurricular activity" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-7-501.(c)"Initial establishment of eligibility requirements" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-6-703.(d)"Online education" means the use of information and communication technologies to deliver educational opportunities to a student in a location other than a school.(e)"Online student" means a student who:(i)participates in an online education program sponsored or supported by the state board, a school district, or a charter school; and(ii)generates funding for the school district or the school pursuant toin accordance with Subsection 53F-2-102(4)53F-2-102(5) and rules of the state board.(2)An online student is eligible to participate in an extracurricular activity at:(a)the school with attendance boundaries within which the student's custodial parent resides, if, for an interscholastic competition of athletic teams, the student did not initially establish the student's eligibility at another public school in grade 9 or 10; or(b)the public school from which the student withdrew for the purpose of participating in an online education program.(3)A public school other than a school described in Subsection (2) may allow an online student to participate in an extracurricular activity that the public school sponsors and supports if:(a)for interschool competitions of athletic teams sponsored and supported by a public school, the online school student meets the initial establishment of eligibility requirements;(b)for interschool contests or competitions for music, drama, or forensic groups or teams sponsored and supported by a public school, the online school student meets the entry requirements for participation;(c)the online school student meets the eligibility requirements under this section; and(d)the online school student meets the enrollment requirements for public school in accordance with Part 4, School District Enrollment.(4)An online student is eligible to participate in an extracurricular activity at a public school consistent with eligibility standards as applied to full-time students of the public school.(5)A school district or public school may not impose additional requirements on an online school student to participate in an extracurricular activity that are not imposed on full-time students of the public school.(6)(a)The state board shall make rules establishing fees for an online school student's participation in an extracurricular activity at school district schools.(b)The rules shall provide that:(i)online school students pay the same fees as other students to participate in an extracurricular activity;(ii)online school students are eligible for fee waivers pursuant to Section 53G-7-504;(iii)for each online school student who participates in an extracurricular activity at a school district school, the online school shall pay a share of the school district's costs for the extracurricular activity; and(iv)an online school's share of the costs of an extracurricular activity shall reflect state and local tax revenues expended, except capital facilities expenditures, for an extracurricular activity in a school district or school divided by total student enrollment of the school district or school.(c)In determining an online school's share of the costs of an extracurricular activity under Subsections (6)(b)(iii) and (iv), the state board may establish uniform fees statewide based on average costs statewide or average costs within a sample of school districts.(7)When selection to participate in an extracurricular activity at a public school is made on a competitive basis, an online student is eligible to try out for and participate in the activity as provided in this section.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.